Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1512
Stay of execution; property and undertakings relinquished.

All property levied on before stay of execution, and all written undertakings for the delivery of personal property to the sheriff, shall be relinquished by the officer upon stay of execution being entered.

Laws 1875, § 8, p. 50;

R.S.1913, § 8053;

C.S.1922, § 8994;

C.S.1929, § 20-1512;

R.S.1943, § 25-1512.